Florida, session 2026, HB1461.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
49
50 Section 1. Section 403.541, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
51 to read:
52 403.541 Advanced nuclear reactors.-
53 (1) As used in this section, the term:
54 (a) "Advanced nuclear reactor" means a nuclear fusion
55 reactor, or a nuclear fission reactor that uses new or
56 significantly improved designs compared to commercial nuclear
57 reactors in operation as of January 1, 2021, including
58 improvements such as:
59 1. Inherent or passive safety features;
60 2. Lower waste yields;
61 3. Improved fuel performance or efficiency;
62 4. Significantly improved designs, materials, fuels, or
63 cooling systems;
64 5. Reduced consumption of cooling water and other
65 environmental impacts; or
66 6. Flexibility in operational output or ability to
67 integrate into electric or nonelectric applications.
68 (b) "Commission" means the Florida Public Service
69 Commission.
70 (c) "Electrical power plant" has the same meaning as
71 provided in s. 403.503.
72 (d) "Nuclear material" means byproduct material, source
73 material, and special nuclear material as those terms are
74 defined in s. 404.31.
75 (2)(a) The authority to regulate advanced nuclear reactors
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
76 in this state is granted to the commission. At a minimum, the
77 commission shall do all of the following:
78 1. Evaluate and approve designs for advanced nuclear
79 reactors.
80 2. Issue permits for the possession, transportation,
81 transfer, and use of nuclear materials in sufficient quantities
82 to facilitate advanced nuclear reactor research, design,
83 testing, construction, and operation.
84 3. Prescribe safety and construction standards for the use
85 of nuclear materials in the development and operation of
86 advanced nuclear reactors.
87 (b) The Department of Health may exercise its powers and
88 duties granted under chapter 404 for the regulation of advanced
89 nuclear reactors under this section. The Department of Health
90 shall develop appropriate guidelines for nuclear facilities and
91 advanced nuclear reactors to mitigate harm to human health
92 resulting from radiological exposure.
93 (c) The Department of Environmental Protection may
94 exercise its powers and duties granted under chapter 403 for the
95 regulation of advanced nuclear reactors under this section. The
96 Department of Environmental Protection shall develop appropriate
97 guidelines for nuclear facilities and advanced nuclear reactors
98 to mitigate environmental harm and promote the efficient and
99 sustainable use of water and other natural resources.
100 (d) The commission, the Department of Health, and the
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
101 Department of Environmental Protection shall jointly establish
102 criteria for the certification of laboratories that perform
103 analysis on nuclear materials for the purpose of researching,
104 designing, testing, or otherwise developing technology for
105 nuclear power plants under this section.
106 (3) A person, corporation, or entity may possess nuclear
107 materials for, and in quantities sufficient to facilitate, the
108 research, design, testing, construction, and operation of
109 advanced nuclear reactors. However, except for active military
110 personnel or contractors acting pursuant to a lawful military
111 order, a person, corporation, or entity may not possess nuclear
112 materials in quantities that pose a danger to national defense
113 and security or public health and safety.
114 (4)(a) The operator of a facility conducting research and
115 testing of advanced nuclear reactors must obtain a permit from
116 the commission for the use and storage of nuclear materials to
117 facilitate such research and testing.
118 (b) A person, corporation, or entity must obtain a permit
119 from the commission for the transfer, receipt, possession, use,
120 or disposal of nuclear materials relating to the operation of
121 advanced nuclear reactors.
122 (c) Before issuing a permit under this subsection, the
123 commission must determine that the facility or reactor is
124 equipped with radiation control devices that will abate or
125 prevent radiological contamination in compliance with the
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
126 standards and rules established under this section.
127 (5)(a) The construction or significant design modification
128 of an advanced nuclear reactor must be certified by the
129 commission before such construction or modification may begin.
130 (b) Before issuing a certification under this subsection,
131 the commission must consider, at a minimum, all of the
132 following:
133 1. The extent to which the design will effectively
134 mitigate and prevent danger to the public health and safety.
135 2. The compliance of the design with the safety standards
136 prescribed by the commission.
137 3. The ability of the design to address known or
138 reasonably foreseeable risks, including system failures,
139 accidents, natural disasters, and extreme weather events.
140 4. The completeness and accuracy of engineering
141 calculations and testing data for the design.
142 5. The ability of the design to promote the efficient and
143 sustainable use of water and other natural resources.
144 (c) The construction or significant design modification of
145 an advanced nuclear reactor must include radiation control
146 devices that will abate or prevent radiological contamination in
147 compliance with the standards and rules established under this
148 section.
149 (6) If an applicant has been issued a permit or
150 certification from another state or federal agency for the
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
151 activities under this section, the commission may issue a
152 reciprocal permit or certification if the safety standards of
153 the other state or federal agency are no less stringent than the
154 standards and rules established under this section.
155 (7) A person, corporation, or entity who violates this
156 section or any rules adopted hereunder is subject to a civil
157 penalty not to exceed $100,000 for each violation for each day
158 the violation persists, except that the maximum civil penalty
159 may not exceed $1 million for any related series of violations.
160 (8) The commission, after consultation with the Department
161 of Health and the Department of Environmental Protection, shall
162 adopt rules to implement this section. In developing such rules,
163 the commission shall refer to part II of this chapter and the
164 rules and regulations established thereunder.
165 Section 2. Paragraph (j) of subsection (2) of section
166 186.801, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (l), and
167 new paragraphs (j) and (k) are added to that section, to read:
168 186.801 Ten-year site plans.—
169 (2) Within 9 months after the receipt of the proposed
170 plan, the commission shall make a preliminary study of such plan
171 and classify it as "suitable" or "unsuitable." The commission
172 may suggest alternatives to the plan. All findings of the
173 commission shall be made available to the Department of
174 Environmental Protection for its consideration at any subsequent
175 electrical power plant site certification proceedings. It is
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
176 recognized that 10-year site plans submitted by an electric
177 utility are tentative information for planning purposes only and
178 may be amended at any time at the discretion of the utility upon
179 written notification to the commission. A complete application
180 for certification of an electrical power plant site under
181 chapter 403, when such site is not designated in the current 10-
182 year site plan of the applicant, shall constitute an amendment
183 to the 10-year site plan. In its preliminary study of each 10-
184 year site plan, the commission shall consider such plan as a
185 planning document and shall review:
186 (j) The amount of nuclear energy resources the utility
187 produces or purchases.
188 (k) The amount of nuclear energy resources the utility
189 plans to produce or purchase over the 10-year planning horizon
190 and the means by which the production or purchases will be
191 achieved.
192 Section 3. Subsection (8) of section 366.02, Florida
193 Statutes, is amended to read:
194 366.02 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
195 (8) "Public utility" means every person, corporation,
196 partnership, association, or other legal entity and their
197 lessees, trustees, or receivers supplying electricity or gas
198 (natural, manufactured, or similar gaseous substance) to or for
199 the public within this state; but the term "public utility" does
200 not include either a cooperative now or hereafter organized and
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
201 existing under the Rural Electric Cooperative Law of the state;
202 a municipality or any agency thereof; any entity, other than an
203 electric utility, which produces electricity from an advanced
204 nuclear reactor that is not interconnected to this state's
205 electrical power grid for its own consumption or supplies such
206 electricity for consumption by a single consumer; any dependent
207 or independent special natural gas district; any natural gas
208 transmission pipeline company making only sales or
209 transportation delivery of natural gas at wholesale and to
210 direct industrial consumers; any entity selling or arranging for
211 sales of natural gas which neither owns nor operates natural gas
212 transmission or distribution facilities within the state; or a
213 person supplying liquefied petroleum gas, in either liquid or
214 gaseous form, irrespective of the method of distribution or
215 delivery, or owning or operating facilities beyond the outlet of
216 a meter through which natural gas is supplied for compression
217 and delivery into motor vehicle fuel tanks or other
218 transportation containers, unless such person also supplies
219 electricity or manufactured or natural gas.
220 Section 4. Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section
221 366.92, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
222 366.92 Florida renewable energy policy.—
223 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the
224 development of clean renewable energy; protect the economic
225 viability of Florida's existing clean renewable energy
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
226 facilities; diversify the types of fuel used to generate
227 electricity in Florida; lessen Florida's dependence on natural
228 gas and fuel oil for the production of electricity; minimize the
229 volatility of fuel costs; encourage investment within the state;
230 improve environmental conditions; and, at the same time,
231 minimize the costs of power supply to electric utilities and
232 their customers.
233 (2) As used in this section, the term:
234 (a) "Clean energy" includes energy produced by nuclear
235 reactors and includes renewable energy and renewable natural gas
236 as those terms are defined in s. 366.91.
237 (b)(a) "Provider" means a "utility" as defined in s.
238 366.8255(1)(a).
239 (b) "Renewable energy" includes renewable energy and
240 renewable natural gas as those terms are defined in s.
241 366.91(2).
242 (3) Each municipal electric utility and rural electric
243 cooperative shall develop standards for the promotion,
244 encouragement, and expansion of the use of clean renewable
245 energy resources and energy conservation and efficiency
246 measures. On or before April 1, annually, each municipal
247 electric utility and electric cooperative shall submit to the
248 commission a report that identifies such standards.
249 Section 5. Paragraph (m) is added to subsection (3) of
250 section 377.601, Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
251 377.601 Legislative intent.—
252 (3) In furtherance of the goals in subsection (2), it is
253 the policy of the state to:
254 (m) Encourage the research, development, demonstration,
255 and application of domestic advanced nuclear energy resources.
256 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 403.506, Florida
257 Statutes, is amended to read:
258 403.506 Applicability, thresholds, and certification.—
259 (1)(a) The provisions of This act applies shall apply to
260 any electrical power plant as defined herein, except that the
261 provisions of this act does shall not apply to the following,
262 unless the applicant has elected to apply for certification
263 under this act:
264 1. Any electrical power plant of less than 75 megawatts in
265 gross capacity, including its associated facilities, unless the
266 applicant has elected to apply for certification of such
267 electrical power plant under this act.
268 2. The provisions of this act shall not apply to Capacity
269 expansions of 75 megawatts or less, in the aggregate, of an
270 existing exothermic reaction cogeneration electrical generating
271 facility that was exempt from this act when it was originally
272 built; however, this exemption shall not apply if the unit uses
273 oil or natural gas for purposes other than unit startup.
274 3. Capacity expansions of 75 megawatts or less, in the
275 aggregate, of one or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
276 in s. 403.541 installed within the boundaries of an electrical
277 power plant site previously certified under this act.
278 4. One or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined in s.
279 403.541 to be located within the boundaries of an electrical
280 power plant site previously certified under this act, provided
281 that:
282 a. The advanced nuclear reactor or reactors are intended
283 to replace an existing electrical power plant located on the
284 site.
285 b. The certificate holder intends to retire the existing
286 electrical power plant from service.
287 c. The gross capacity of the advanced nuclear reactor or
288 reactors, in the aggregate, does not exceed the gross capacity
289 of the electrical power plant to be retired.
290 5. One or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined in s.
291 403.541 that are not interconnected to this state's electrical
292 power grid and that are owned by an entity other than an
293 electric utility for purposes of producing power for its own
294 consumption or for use by a single consumer of electrical power.
295 (b) The No construction of any new electrical power plant
296 or expansion in steam generating capacity as measured by an
297 increase in the maximum electrical generator rating of any
298 existing electrical power plant may not be undertaken after
299 October 1, 1973, without first obtaining certification in the
300 manner as herein provided, except that this act shall not apply
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
301 to any such electrical power plant which is presently operating
302 or under construction or which has, upon the effective date of
303 chapter 73-33, Laws of Florida, applied for a permit or
304 certification under requirements in force prior to the effective
305 date of such act.
306 Section 7. Subsection (3) of section 403.519, Florida
307 Statutes, is amended to read:
308 403.519 Exclusive forum for determination of need.—
309 (3) The commission shall be the sole forum for the
310 determination of this matter, which accordingly may shall not be
311 raised in any other forum or in the review of proceedings in
312 such other forum. In making its determination, the commission
313 shall take into account the need for electric system reliability
314 and integrity, the need for adequate electricity at a reasonable
315 cost, the need for fuel diversity and supply reliability,
316 whether the proposed plant is the most cost-effective
317 alternative available, and whether nuclear renewable energy
318 resources sources and technologies, as well as conservation
319 measures, are used utilized to the extent reasonably available.
320 The commission shall also expressly consider the conservation
321 measures taken by or reasonably available to the applicant or
322 its members which might mitigate the need for the proposed plant
323 and other matters within its jurisdiction which it deems
324 relevant. The commission's determination of need for an
325 electrical power plant shall create a presumption of public need
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1461 2026
326 and necessity and shall serve as the commission's report
327 required by s. 403.507(4). An order entered pursuant to this
328 section constitutes final agency action.
329 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1461-01-c1